Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.325

Medical use of cannabis-infused products—Administration by parent or guardian—School districts to develop policies.

(1) A school district must permit a student who meets the requirements of RCW 69.51A.220 to consume cannabis-infused products for medical purposes on school grounds, aboard a school bus, or while attending a school-sponsored event in accordance with the school district's policy adopted under this section.

(2) Upon the request of a parent or guardian of a student who meets the requirements of RCW 69.51A.220, the board of directors of a school district shall adopt a policy to authorize parents or guardians to administer cannabis-infused products to a student for medical purposes while the student is on school grounds, aboard a school bus, or attending a school-sponsored event. The policy must, at a minimum:

(a) Require that the student be authorized to use cannabis-infused products for medical purposes pursuant to RCW 69.51A.220 and that the parent or guardian acts as the designated provider for the student and assists the student with the consumption of the cannabis while on school grounds, aboard a school bus, or attending a school-sponsored event;

(b) Establish protocols for verifying the student is authorized to use cannabis for medical purposes and the parent or guardian is acting as the designated provider for the student pursuant to RCW 69.51A.220. The school may consider a student's and parent's or guardian's valid recognition cards to be proof of compliance with RCW 69.51A.220;

(c) Expressly authorize parents or guardians of students who have been authorized to use cannabis for medical purposes to administer cannabis-infused products to the student while the student is on school grounds at a location identified pursuant to (d) of this subsection (2), aboard a school bus, or attending a school-sponsored event;

(d) Identify locations on school grounds where cannabis-infused products may be administered; and

(e) Prohibit the administration of medical cannabis to a student by smoking or other methods involving inhalation while the student is on school grounds, aboard a school bus, or attending a school-sponsored event.

(3) School district officials, employees, volunteers, students, and parents and guardians acting in accordance with the school district policy adopted under subsection (2) of this section may not be arrested, prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions, or civil or professional consequences for possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent to manufacture or deliver cannabis under state law, or have real or personal property seized or forfeited for possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver cannabis under state law.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis-infused products" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

[ 2022 c 16 s 25; 2019 c 204 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.